big-grammar-nostress/big.grammar.foma
read lexc big.ur.lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;

source features.foma

# Composite features
define +dor %-syl & [ %+hi | %+lo | %+back ] ;
define +pal %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %-back ];
define +velar %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %+back ] ; # confirm this

define +plos [ %-son & %-cont & %-delrel ] ;
define +fric [ %-son & %+cont ] ;
define +approx [ %+son & %-nas ] ;
define -approx [ ~%+approx | r | ɾ ] ;

# Word final sonorant consonantal deletion, /n r/
define SonCorDeletion [ %-approx & %-syl & %+cor & %+son] -> 0 || _ .#. ;

# Word final rhotic tap becomes trill. Must occur after
# SonCorDeletion.
# 
#	- ziŋɡəɾ+Masc	ziŋɡər
#
# But there are exceptions!
#	- zuukoɾ+Masc	zuukor should be zuuko
# 
# Is it stress related?
define RhoticDeflapping ɾ -> r || _ .#. ;

# Adjacent homorganic cons deletion
define HomCorDeletion [ %-syl & %+cor ] -> 0 || [ %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] _ .#. ;
define HomDorDeletion [ %-syl & %+dor ] -> 0 || [ %-syl & %+dor & %+son ] _ .#. ;
define HomDeletion HomCorDeletion .o. HomDorDeletion ;

# Nasal place assimilation
# Yes but.. something more complicated going on
# e.g. forassenyat
# Also, by specifying -ant we're predicting h and t͡ʃ, but maybe that makes sense.

define AnteriorAssim n -> ɲ || _ [ %-ant ] ;
define VelarAssim n -> ŋ || _ [ %+velar ] ;
define NasalPlaceAssim VelarAssim .o. AnteriorAssim;

# Vocalic deletion: vowels followed by schwa are deleted, with a few exceptions.
define VocDeletion [ %+syl ] -> 0 || _ ə .#. ;

define VocDeletionExceptions [
	[{nu} 	"+Fem" .x. {nuə}] |
	[{kru} 	"+Fem" .x. {kruə}]
] ;

# Word final plosive devoicing
define WordFinPlosiveDevoicing  ɡ -> k,
 								d -> t,
 								b -> p,
 								z -> s || _ .#. ;

# Word final affrication
# [+fric] -> [-cont, +delrel]
define WordFinAffrication ʒ -> t͡ʃ,
						  ð -> d͡ʒ || _ .#. ;

# Voiced stops become (continuant) fricatives in between sonorant continuants
# [ %+plos & %+voi ] -> [ %+cont ] || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ]
define InterConFrication ɡ -> ɣ,
						 d -> ð,
						 b -> β || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ] ;

# Surely there will be more.
define Exceptions VocDeletionExceptions;

# SYLLABIFICATION

# STRESS ASSIGNMENT

# VOWEL REDUCTION

# GEMINATION

# tuitib+Masc	->	tuitiuw

define Grammar Lexicon
	.o. NasalPlaceAssim
	.o. SonCorDeletion
#	.o. RhoticDeflapping
	.o. HomDeletion
	.o. VocDeletion
 	.o. WordFinPlosiveDevoicing
 	.o. WordFinAffrication
 	.o. InterConFrication;

define Grammar [Exceptions .P. Grammar];

read lexc big.sr.lexicon.lexc
define SRLexicon;

define CorrectPredictions [SRLexicon - Grammar];
define IncorrectPredictions [CorrectPredictions.u .o. Grammar];

regex CorrectPredictions;
pairs > correct

regex IncorrectPredictions;
pairs > incorrect
